District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2310

Board of Directors — Powers.

Repealed.

History

June 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 266, ch. 324, § 6
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1810.
1973 Ed., § 31-1030.